District of Columbia statutes.
38-1204.04

Annual report.

The Trustees shall make an annual report to the general public, Mayor, Council, and the Congress on December 31st of each year on the operation of programs and the expenditure of all funds for public postsecondary education in the District of Columbia. Such annual report shall include, but not be limited to, the source, amount, distribution and expenditure of all funds whatever the source; and general student enrollment data, including, but not limited to, race, sex, age, major area of study, previous and current residency and upon graduation or termination of study, employment placement data (consistent with existing statutes and Department of Education regulations).

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1430, Pub. L. 93-471, title IV, § 404
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 5, 22 DCR 2933
1981 Ed., § 31-1534.
1973 Ed., § 31-1734.
“Department of Education,” referred to in the last sentence of this section, was substituted for “Department of Health, Education and Welfare,” pursuant to § 301 of the Act of October 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 677, Pub. L. 96-88.